test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb4syll_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/gebáhtarattátor-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/gebáhtarattátor-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# 4-syllable verbs. Lexicon RAVGGALASSTET_IV, GUOTTEDALLAT_IV, HIEBADUVVAT_IV, BIEKKASTALLAT_IV, BASSALASSTET_TV

Tests:
  Verb - báhtaraddat: # RAVGGALlET_IV
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Inf: báhtaraddat 
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Sup: báhtarattatjit
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ger: báhtarattadijn
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+PrfPrc: báhtaraddam
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+PrsPrc: báhtaradde
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: báhtaraddamin
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: báhtaraddamis
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+VAbess: báhtarattak
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+VGen: báhtaratta
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: báhtarattav
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: báhtaratta
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: báhtaraddá
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: báhtaraddin 
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: báhtaraddabihtte
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: báhtaraddaba
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: báhtaraddap 
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: báhtaraddabihtit
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: báhtaraddi
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: báhtaraddiv
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: báhtaraddi
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: báhtarattaj
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: báhtarattajma
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: báhtarattajda
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: báhtarattajga
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: báhtarattajma 
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: báhtarattajda
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: báhtaraddin
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: báhtaratta
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: báhtaraddis
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: báhtaraddon 
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: báhtaradde
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: báhtaraddiska
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: báhtaraddup
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: báhtaraddut
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: báhtaraddusa
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: báhtarattatjav
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: báhtarattatja
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: báhtarattasj
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: báhtarattatji
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: báhtarattaduvvá
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: báhtarattalulu
    báhtaraddat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: báhtarattalulujma

  Verb - rabjrabjastalallat: # RAVGGALASSET_IV
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Inf: rabjastallat 
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Sup: rabjastalátjit
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ger: rabjastaládijn
    rabjastallat+V+IV+PrfPrc: rabjastallam
    rabjastallat+V+IV+PrsPrc: rabjastalle
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: rabjastallamin
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: rabjastallamis
    rabjastallat+V+IV+VAbess: rabjastalák
    rabjastallat+V+IV+VGen: rabjastalá
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rabjastaláv
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rabjastalá
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rabjastallabihtit
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rabjastalli
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rabjastalliv
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rabjastalli
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rabjastaláj
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: rabjastalájma 
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: rabjastalájda
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rabjastalájga
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: rabjastalá
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: rabjastallis
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: rabjastallon 
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: rabjastalle
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: rabjastalliska
    rabjastallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: rabjastallup
    rabjastallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: rabjastallut
    rabjastallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: rabjastallusa
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: rabjastalátjav
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: rabjastalátja
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: rabjastalásj
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: rabjastalátji
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rabjastaláduvvá
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: rabjastalálulu
    rabjastallat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: rabjastalálulujma

  Verb - rievodallat: # GUOTTEDALLAT_IV
    rievodallat+V+IV+Inf: rievodallat 
    rievodallat+V+IV+Sup: rievodalátjit
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ger: rievodaládijn
    rievodallat+V+IV+PrfPrc: rievodallam
    rievodallat+V+IV+PrsPrc: rievodalle
    rievodallat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: rievodallamin
    rievodallat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: rievodallamis
    rievodallat+V+IV+VAbess: rievodalák
    rievodallat+V+IV+VGen: rievodalá
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: rievodaláv
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: rievodalá
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: rievodallabihtit
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: rievodalli
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: rievodalliv
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: rievodalli
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: rievodaláj
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: rievodalájma 
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: rievodalájda
    rievodallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: rievodalájga
    rievodallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: rievodalá
    rievodallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: rievodallis
    rievodallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: rievodallon 
    rievodallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: rievodalle
    rievodallat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: rievodalliska
    rievodallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: rievodallup
    rievodallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: rievodallut
    rievodallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: rievodallusa
    rievodallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: rievodalátjav
    rievodallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: rievodalátja
    rievodallat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: rievodalásj
    rievodallat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: rievodalátji
    rievodallat+V+IV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: [] # already passive
    rievodallat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: rievodalálulu
    rievodallat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: rievodalálulujma

  Verb - goadájduvvat: # HIEBADUVVAT_IV
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Inf: goadájduvvat 
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Sup: goadájduvátjit
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ger: goadájduvádijn
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+PrfPrc: [goadájduvvam, goadájdum]
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+PrsPrc: goadájduvve
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: goadájduvvamin
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: goadájduvvamis
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+VAbess: goadájduvák
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+VGen: goadájduvá
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: goadájduváv
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: goadájduvá
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: goadájduvvabihtit
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: goadájduvvi
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: goadájduvviv
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: goadájduvvi
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: goadájduváj
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: goadájduvájma 
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: goadájduvájda
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: goadájduvájga
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: goadájduvá
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: goadájduvvis
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Imprt+Du1: goadájduvvon 
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: goadájduvve
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Imprt+Du3: goadájduvviska
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl1: goadájduvvup
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: goadájduvvut
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: goadájduvvusa
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: goadájduvátjav
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: goadájduvátja
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: goadájduvásj
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: goadájduvátji
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: [] #already passive
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: goadájduválulu
    goadájduvvat+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: goadájduválulujma

  Verb - skibludallat: # BIEKKASTALLAT_IV Impersonal
    skibludallat+V+IV+Inf: skibludallat
    skibludallat+V+IV+Sup: skibludalátjit
    skibludallat+V+IV+Ger: skibludaládijn
    skibludallat+V+IV+PrfPrc: skibludallam
    skibludallat+V+IV+PrsPrc: [] # Impersonal
    skibludallat+V+IV+Actio+Ess: skibludallamin
    skibludallat+V+IV+Actio+Ela: skibludallamis
    skibludallat+V+IV+VAbess: skibludalák
    skibludallat+V+IV+VGen: skibludalá
    skibludallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: []
    skibludallat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skibludallá
    skibludallat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: skibludaláj
    skibludallat+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: skibludallis
    skibludallat+V+IV+ImprtII+Sg3: skibludallus
    skibludallat+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []

  Verb - unnedasstet: # BASSALASSTET_TV
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Inf: unnedasstet 
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Sup: unnedastátjit
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ger: unnedastedijn
    unnedasstet+V+TV+PrfPrc: unnedasstám
    unnedasstet+V+TV+PrsPrc: unnedasste
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Actio+Ess: unnedasstemin
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Actio+Ela: unnedasstemis
    unnedasstet+V+TV+VAbess: unnedastek
    unnedasstet+V+TV+VGen: unnedaste
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unnedastáv
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: unnedastá
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: unnedasstebihtit
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: unnedassti
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: unnedasstiv
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: unnedassti
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: unnedastij
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: unnedastijma 
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: unnedastijda
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: unnedastijga
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: unnedaste
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: unnedasstis
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: unnedasston 
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: unnedasste
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: unnedasstiska
    unnedasstet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: unnedasstup
    unnedasstet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: unnedasstut
    unnedasstet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: unnedasstusa
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: unnedastitjav
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: unnedastitja
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: unnedastisj
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: unnedastitji
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Inf: unnedasteduvvat
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Inf: unnedasstut
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unnedasteduváv
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: unnedasstuv
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassL+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: unnedasteduvvá
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassS+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: unnedasstu
    unnedasstet+V+TV+Der/PassD+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: unnedastádallá
    unnedasstet+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: unnedastálulu
    unnedasstet+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: unnedastálulujma
